District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5110.01

Insurance plans and programs submitted pursuant to § 42-836.01(2)(B).

Repealed.

History

Sept. 25, 1962, 76 Stat. 580, Pub. L. 87-686, § 10a
as added Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 1411(b)(2), 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(a)

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).

Emergency Legislation

Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.

Effective Dates

Section 602(a) of Law 14-132 provided: “The Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Act of 2000, effective April 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-263; 48 DCR 991), is repealed as of November 6, 2001.”